Tennessee statutes. Title 16 Courts
Part 7

Court Buildings Commissions

16-3-701. Commission to control supreme court building at Nashville.

There is created a commission composed of the chief justice of the supreme court, who shall serve as chair, the presiding judge of the court of appeals or the presiding judge's designee, the presiding judge of the court of criminal appeals or presiding judge's designee, the administrative director of the courts, the clerk of the supreme court, and one (1) other member from the supreme court to be elected by the membership of the supreme court, which commission is vested with authority and jurisdiction to supervise and control the supreme court building at Nashville, to employ all necessary assistants and help for the building, and to make necessary contracts therefor.

Acts 1953, ch. 138, § 1 (Williams, § 1032.3); 1965, ch. 184, § 1; 1975, ch. 73, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-324; Acts 1984, ch. 833, § 1; 1993, ch. 66, § 20; 1994, ch. 897, § 3.

16-3-702. Commission to control court building at Knoxville.

There is created a commission composed of the chief justice of the supreme court, who shall serve as chair, the presiding judge of the court of appeals or the presiding judge's designee, the presiding judge of the court of criminal appeals or the presiding judge's designee, the administrative director of the courts, the clerk of the supreme court, and one (1) other member from the supreme court to be elected by the membership of the supreme court, which commission is vested with authority and jurisdiction to supervise and control the court and office building at Knoxville, and to employ all necessary assistants and help for the building, and make necessary contracts therefor.

Acts 1953, ch. 138, § 1 (Williams, § 1032.3); 1965, ch. 184, § 1; 1975, ch. 73, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-324; Acts 1984, ch. 833, § 2; 1993, ch. 66, § 21; 1994, ch. 897, § 4.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Supreme Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 191.

16-3-703. Commission to control court building at Jackson.

There is created a commission composed of the chief justice of the supreme court, who shall serve as chair, the presiding judge of the court of appeals or the presiding judge's designee, the presiding judge of the court of criminal appeals or the presiding judge's designee, the administrative director of the courts, the clerk of the supreme court, and one (1) other member from the supreme court to be elected by the membership of the supreme court, which commission is vested with the authority and jurisdiction to supervise and control the court and office building at Jackson, and to employ all necessary assistants and help for the building, and make necessary contracts therefor.

Acts 1984, ch. 833, § 3; 1993, ch. 66, § 22; 1994, ch. 897, § 5.